Illinois, session 104th, HB2507.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-5.2a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.2a new)7    Sec. 5-5.2a. Minimum resident care requirement for nursing 8facility payments.9    (a) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2026, and 10each calendar year thereafter, a nursing facility must spend 11at least 90% of its adjusted total revenue on resident care and 12other resident-related costs. For purposes of this Section, 13"resident care and other resident-related costs" means the 14direct care provided to a facility resident by a nurse, 15certified nurse aide, or certified nurse assistant; support 16services, including food service, laundry, housekeeping, nurse 17administration, activity programs, social services, and 18transportation, as identified in reports required by the 19Department; and ancillary program services, including medical, 20dental, podiatric, and laboratory services, inhalation, and 21other physical, mental, or occupational therapeutics, as 22identified in reports required by the Department. "Resident 23care and other resident-related costs" does not include   HB2507- 2 -LRB104 09211 KTG 19268 b1administrative costs (other than nurse administration), 2capital costs, debt service, taxes (other than sales taxes or 3payroll taxes), capital depreciation, rent and leases, and 4fiscal services. Resident care and other resident-related 5costs are subject to exclusions and subtractions under 6paragraph (c).7    For purposes of this Section, "adjusted total revenue" 8consists of the total operating revenue of a nursing facility 9plus interest or other investment income and excluding CNA 10tenure payments under paragraph (2) of subsection (l) of 11Section 5-5.2.12    (b) Each nursing facility shall provide as part of its 13financial reporting under Sections 5-5.7 and 5B-5 information 14necessary for the Department to administer and enforce the 15provisions of this Section. Information provided shall be 16subject to audit provisions and comply with any uniform 17standards developed under Section 5-5.7.18    (c) All non-allowable costs, related party adjustments, or 19compensation to owners reported shall be excluded from the 20calculation of the amount spent on resident care and other 21resident-related costs. To the extent that the value of any 22related party transaction is greater than fair market value, 23such related party cost shall be deducted from the amount 24spent on resident care and other resident-related costs. 25% 25of costs associated with contract nursing staff shall be 26deducted from the amount spent on resident care and other   HB2507- 3 -LRB104 09211 KTG 19268 b1resident-related costs. CNA tenure payments under paragraph 2(2) of subsection (l) of Section 5-5.2 shall be deducted from 3the amount spent on resident care and other resident-related 4costs.5    (d) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2027, and 6each calendar year thereafter, the Department shall use the 7required financial reporting submissions to determine whether 8each nursing facility has met the minimum resident care 9percent requirement. A facility's resident care and other 10resident-related costs divided by the facility's adjusted 11total revenue must be greater than 0.9.12    (e) If a facility has not met the minimum resident care 13percent requirement, the amount defined by the facility's 14total adjusted revenue multiplied by 0.9 minus the facility's 15resident care and other resident-related costs, divided by the 16facility's total adjusted revenue and multiplied by the 17facility's total adjusted revenue from the medical assistance 18program, shall be treated as a vendor overpayment under this 19Code. The Department shall recover the full amount of any 20vendor overpayment under this Section by reducing future 21payments, requiring direct payment to the Department, or any 22other method permitted under this Code.23    (f) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 24administer the provisions of this Section.25